Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.030

Rules—Interference with director proscribed.

The director may adopt those rules as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter. No person shall interfere with the director when he or she is performing or carrying out any duties imposed upon the director by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 326 s 47; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.